Maine, session 132, LD2164.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5158-A is enacted to read:
§5158-A. Vacant School Housing Conversion Program; fund established
The Vacant School Housing Conversion Program, referred to in this section as "the
program," is established within the Maine Redevelopment Land Bank Authority, referred
to in this section as "the redevelopment authority."
1. Program. The program authorizes the redevelopment authority to provide technical
and financial assistance to a municipality that chooses to convert a vacant school building
that has been closed and transferred to the municipality pursuant to Title 20-A, section
4103, subsection 3 into a property that provides residential housing units, a percentage of
which as determined in the memorandum of understanding under subsection 2 is dedicated
as affordable housing as defined in section 5002, subsection 2.
2. Program elements. The redevelopment authority shall provide technical and
financial assistance to a municipality that applies to the program in a manner determined
by the redevelopment authority and meets the criteria as established by the redevelopment
authority for participation in the program as determined by the redevelopment authority. A
participating municipality shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
redevelopment authority as a condition of participation. The technical and financial
assistance provided by the redevelopment authority pursuant to the memorandum of
understanding may include, but is not limited to:
A. Overseeing environmental assessment requirements, hazard abatement and clean-
up efforts;
B. Determining the legal and financial feasibility of the property conversion;
C. Navigating zoning and regulatory requirements of development;
D. Acting as liaison between a municipality and state and local housing authorities;
E. Determining the specific goals of a conversion in alignment with a comprehensive
plan or stated community priorities for development of the property;
F. Facilitating partnerships between municipalities that may seek to offer school
buildings in each respective municipality as part of a package of properties for
conversion;
G. Structuring a request for proposals from entities seeking to purchase the property;
H. Identifying financing strategies, incentive programs and potential funding sources
available to a municipality or entity chosen to develop the property; and
I. On behalf of a municipality, acting as the administrator of a request for proposals
crafted in accordance with the memorandum of understanding and as manager of the
contract for development of the property.
3. Maine School Conversion Fund; establishment and use. The Maine School
Conversion Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established within the
redevelopment authority to support the development of vacant school buildings into
properties that will provide residential housing and that include a minimum percentage of
units, as determined by the municipalities and specified in the memoranda of understanding
Page 1 - 132LR2846(01)

412 under subsection 2, dedicated as affordable housing as defined in section 5002, subsection
423 2. The fund may not lapse but must be carried forward to carry out the purposes of this
434 section. The fund may receive money from any available state, federal or private source.
445 Money in the fund may be used by the redevelopment authority only when acting, pursuant
456 to subsection 2, paragraph I, as the administrator of requests for proposals on behalf of a
467 participating municipality and only for the purposes described in this section. Expenditures
478 from the fund may include, but are not limited to:
A. Design and engineering feasibility studies;
B. Providing access to established utilities for the property to be developed;
C. Property improvements, such as demolition or environmental hazard mitigation
necessary to attract requests for proposals from entities bidding to develop the vacant
school buildings;
D. Hazardous material removal or abatement and other environmental clean-up efforts
for which alternative sources of funding are not available;
E. Subsidies to support costs directly related to the affordable housing units included
as part of the development; and
F. Capital investment to leverage matching funds or nonstate grants.
4. Report. Beginning February 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, the redevelopment
authority shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over housing matters. The report must summarize the technical and financial
assistance provided to municipalities in accordance with this section for the previous
calendar year, the status of school building conversions supported by the program, the
number of housing units created and an evaluation of the impact attributed to the program
on the economy and housing supply of participating municipalities. The report must also
include information collected by the redevelopment authority on the number of vacant
school buildings for which conversion to a property that provides residential housing is
feasible.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE REDEVELOPMENT LAND BANK AUTHORITY
Maine School Conversion Fund N562
Initiative: Establishes and provides ongoing funding to the Maine School Conversion Fund
to assist municipalities with converting unused school buildings into properties that provide
residential housing.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $5,000,000